Rhode Island, session 2025, SB955.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-9-1.4 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-9 entitled "Children" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
11-9-1.4. Minor electronically disseminating indecent material to another person —
“Sexting” prohibited.
(a) Definitions as used in this section:
(1) “Minor” means any person not having reached eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) “Computer” has the meaning given to that term in § 11-52-1;
(3) “Telecommunication device” means an analog or digital electronic device which
processes data, telephony, video, or sound transmission as part of any system involved in the
sending and/or receiving at a distance of voice, sound, data, and/or video transmissions;
(4) “Indecent visual depiction” means any digital image or digital video of the minor
engaging in sexually explicit conduct, and includes data stored on any computer,
telecommunication device, or other electronic storage media which is capable of conversion into a
visual image;
(5) “Sexually explicit conduct” means actual masturbation or graphic focus on or lascivious
exhibition of the nude genitals or pubic area of the minor.
(b) No minor shall knowingly and voluntarily and without threat or coercion use a
computer or telecommunication device to transmit an indecent visual depiction of himself or herself
themselves to another person.

(c) No minor shall knowingly, voluntarily, and without the use of threat or coercion solicit
an indecent visual depiction from another minor.
(d) No minor shall possess an indecent visual depiction sent from another minor.
(e) A violation of this section shall be a status offense and referred to the family court.
(d)(f) Any minor adjudicated under alleged to have committed the status offense in
subsection subsections (b), (c) or (d) shall not be charged under § 11-9-1.3 and, further, shall not
be subject to sex offender registration requirements set forth in § 11-37.1-1 et seq., entitled “Sexual
Offender Registration and Community Notification Act.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002605
========
LC002605 - Page 2 of 3